Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.040

Personal appearance.

Except as provided in RCW 42.45.280, if a notarial act relates to a statement made in or a signature executed on a record, the individual making the statement or executing the signature shall appear personally before the notarial officer.

[ 2019 c 154 s 3; 2017 c 281 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 154: See note following RCW 42.45.280.